Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1819.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 420 of Title 19, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Citizen Access


to County Facilities Act”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 420.1 of Title 19, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in this act:


1. “County” means a county, county officer, or county employee;



Req. No. 3543 Page 1


2. “County facilities” means buildings or lands owned and


maintained by a county that include, but are not limited to:


a. parks,


b. senior centers,


c. barns, and


d. fairgrounds;


3. “Inherent risks of an activity using county facilities”


means those dangers or conditions that are inherent in an event or


activity, including certain hazards, surface and subsurface


conditions, natural conditions of land, vegetation, and waters, and


ordinary dangers of structures or equipment present in county


facilities. Inherent risks of an activity using county facilities


also include the potential of a participant to act in a negligent


manner that may contribute to injury to the participant or others,


including failure to follow instructions given by the county or


failing to exercise reasonable caution; and


4. “Participant” means any person, other than a county officer


or county employee.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 420.2 of Title 19, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. In addition to any limitations of liability afforded


pursuant to The Governmental Tort Claims Act and except as provided


in subsection B of this section, a county shall not be liable for

Req. No. 3543 Page 2


injury to or death of a participant resulting from the inherent


risks of an activity using county facilities, as long as the warning


contained in Section 4 of this act is posted as required and, except


as provided in subsection B of this section, no participant or


participant’s representative can maintain an action against or


recover damages from a county for injury, loss, damage, or death of


the participant resulting exclusively from any of the inherent risks


of an activity using county facilities. In any action for damages


against a county for an activity using county facilities, the county


shall plead the affirmative defense of assumption of the inherent


risks of an activity using county facilities by the participant.


B. Nothing in subsection A of this section prevents or limits


the liability of a county if the county:


1. Commits an act or omission that constitutes willful or


wanton disregard for the safety of the participant, and that act or


omission proximately causes injury, damage, or death to the


participant; or


2. Has actual knowledge or reasonably should have known of a


dangerous condition present at county facilities used in the


activity and does not make the danger known to the participant, and


the danger proximately causes injury, damage, or death to the


participant.





Req. No. 3543 Page 3


C. Any limitation on liability afforded by this section to a


county is in addition to any other limitations of liability


otherwise provided by law.


D. The district attorney shall be allowed to issue an


indemnification of limited liability for the fair use of county


facilities for a county within his or her district.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 420.3 of Title 19, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Every county shall post and maintain signs that contain the


warning notice specified in subsection B of this section. The sign


shall be placed in a clearly visible location at the entrance or


entrances to county facilities and at the site of the activity using


county facilities. The warning notice shall consist of a sign in


black letters, with each letter to be a minimum of one (1) inch in


height. Every written contract entered into by a county for the


provision of county facilities for an activity shall contain in


clearly readable print the warning notice specified in subsection B


of this section.


B. The signs and contracts described in subsection A of this


section shall contain the following notice of warning:


“WARNING:


Under Oklahoma law, there is no liability for an injury to or


death of a participant at an activity using county facilities.

Req. No. 3543 Page 4


Inherent risks of activities using county facilities include, but


are not limited to, risks of injury inherent to land and equipment,


as well as the potential for you to act in a negligent manner that


may contribute to your injury or death. You are assuming the risk


of participating in this activity using county facilities.”


C. Failure to comply with the requirements concerning warning


signs and notices provided in this section shall prevent a county


from invoking the privileges of immunity provided by this act.


SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 420.4 of Title 19, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


The rights of Oklahomans to use county facilities shall not be


prohibited by any county in this state. All activities using county


facilities shall be conducted pursuant to law and in compliance with


health and safety zoning requirements and regulations.


SECTION 6. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3543 BRC 1/14/2026 10:13:29 PM













Req. No. 3543 Page 5